sv: Enhetsgränssnitt: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banankontakt; Bindande inlägg; Bluetooth; Koaxial; Koaxial (F-typ); Komponentvideo; Kompositvideo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Skärmport; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infraröd; Belysning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD-kort; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-kort; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellit; TOSLINK; TRS; Delning; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Trådlös laddning; Trådlös display; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Annat
hr-HR: Sučelje uređaja: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banana konektor; Vezni stup; Bluetooth; Koaksijalna veza; Koaksijalna veza (F-tip); Komponentni videosignal; Kompozitni videosignal; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; DisplayPort; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infracrveno; Osvjetljenje; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; MicroSD kartica; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD kartica; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelit; TOSLINK; TRS; Povezivanje; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Bežično punjenje; Bežični zaslon; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Ostalo
pt-PT: Interface do dispositivo: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Conector banana; Conector; Bluetooth; Coaxial; Coaxial (Tipo F); Vídeo componente; Vídeo composto; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infravermelho; Raio; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Cartão Micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-vídeo; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Cartão SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satélite; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Carregamento sem fios; Ecrã sem fios; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Outro
it: Interfaccia del dispositivo: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Connettore a banana; Connettore binding post; Bluetooth; Coassiale; Coassiale (tipo F); Componente video; Video composito; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarossi; Illuminazione; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Scheda microSD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Scheda SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellitare; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Caricabatterie wireless; Display wireless; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Altro
el: Διασύνδεση συσκευής: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Βύσμα Banana; Ακροδέκτης σύνδεσης; Bluetooth; Ομοαξονικό καλώδιο; Ομοαξονική (τύπου F); Συνιστώσα βίντεο; Σύνθετο σήμα βίντεο; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; DisplayPort; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Υπέρυθρες; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Κάρτα Micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Κάρτα SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Δορυφορική; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Ασύρματη φόρτιση; Ασύρματη οθόνη; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Άλλο
ko: 장치 인터페이스: 12G-SDI; 2.5mm; 3.5mm; 3G-SDI; 6.35mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; 바나나 커넥터; 바인딩 포스트; Bluetooth; 동축; 동축(F형); 컴포넌트 비디오; 복합 비디오; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; 디스플레이 포트; 이더넷; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE(PATA); 적외선; Lightning; M.2; 미디; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD 카드; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S비디오; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD 카드; SDI; SMA; SPI; 위성; 토스링크; TRS; 테더링; 썬더볼트; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 무선 충전; 무선 디스플레이; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; 기타
sl-SI: Vmesnik naprave: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banana priključek; Konektor binding post; Bluetooth; Koaksialna; Koaksialna (F-vrsta); Komponentni video; Kompozitni video; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrardeča; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD kartica; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD kartica; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelit; TOSLINK; TRS; Deljenje mobilnega interneta; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Brezžično polnjenje; Brezžični zaslon; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Drugo
zh-CN: 设备接口: 12G-SDI; 2.5 毫米; 3.5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6.35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; 香蕉插头; 连接柱; 蓝牙; 同轴; 同轴（F 型）; 分量视频; 复合视频信号; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; 显示端口; 以太网; 火线; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); 红外; 闪电; M.2; 及膝; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; 微型 SD 卡; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; 超级视频; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD 卡; SDI; SMA; SPI; 卫星; TOSLINK; TRS; 移动热点共享; 雷电接口; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 无线充电; 无线显示; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; 其他
ro-RO: Interfață dispozitiv: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Conector banană; Bornă de conexiuni; Bluetooth; Coaxială; Coaxială (Tip F); Video component; Video compozit; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Port de afișare; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infraroșu; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Card micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Crd SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelit; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Încărcare fără fir; Afișaj fără fir; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Altele
es: Interfaz del dispositivo: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; Auxiliar; BNC; Conector banana; Poste de conexión; Bluetooth; Coaxial; Coaxial (tipo F); Video por componentes; Video compuesto; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Puerto de pantalla; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarrojo; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Tarjeta micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Tarjeta SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satélite; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Carga inalámbrica; Pantalla inalámbrica; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Otros
ja: デバイスインターフェース: 12G-SDI; 2.5mm; 3.5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6.35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; バナナコネクター; バインディングポスト; Bluetooth; 同軸; 同軸 (Fタイプ); コンポーネント映像; コンポジット映像; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; ディスプレイポート; イーサネット; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); 赤外線; Lightning; M.2; ミディ; マイクロBNC; マイクロDIN; マイクロSDカード; Micro USB; マイクロXLR; マイクロVGA; ミニDIN; ミニVGA; モレックス; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S映像; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SDカード; SDI; SMA; SPI; サテライト; トスリンク; TRS; テザリング; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; ワイヤレス充電; ワイヤレスディスプレイ; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; その他
lt-LT: Įrenginio sąsaja: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Bananinė jungtis; Bananinio kištuko lizdas; „Bluetooth“; Bendraašė; Bendraašė (F tipo); Komponentinė vaizdo; Kompozitinė vaizdo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Ekrano prievadas; Eterneto; „Firewire“; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infraraudonųjų spindulių; Apšvietimo; M.2; MIDI; „Micro BNC“; „Micro DIN“; „Micro SD“ kortelė; „Micro USB“; „Micro XLR“; „Micro-VGA“; „Mini-DIN“; „Mini-VGA“; „Molex“; NFC; NL2; NL4; „PCIe“; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD kortelė; SDI; SMA; SPI; Palydovinė; TOSLINK; TRS; „Tethering“ sąsaja; „Thunderbolt“; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Belaidis įkrovimas; Belaidis ekranas; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Kita
zh-TW: 裝置介面: 12G-SDI; 2.5 毫米; 3.5 毫米; 3G-SDI; 6.35 毫米; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; 香蕉接頭; 接線柱; 藍牙; 同軸; 同軸（F 型）; 色差影音; 複合影音; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; 顯示器連接埠; 乙太網路; 火線; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE（PATA）; 紅外線; 閃電; M.2; 中長裙; 微型 BNC; 微型 DIN; 微型 SD 卡; 微型 USB; 微型 XLR; 微型 VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; 莫仕; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; 個人電腦連接埠; RCA; RFID; S 端子; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD 卡; SDI; SMA; SPI; 衛星; TOSLINK; TRS; 網路分享; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; 無線充電; 無線顯示; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; 其他
th: อินเทอร์เฟซอุปกรณ์: 12G-SDI; 2.5 มม.; 3.5 มม.; 3G-SDI; 6.35 มม.; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; ขั้วต่อกล้วย; ขั้วต่อไบดิ้งโพส; บลูทูธ; โคแอกเซียล; โคแอกเชียล (ชนิด F); สายวิดีโอคอมโพเนนต์; สัญญาณวิดีโอแบบคอมโพสิต; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; พอร์ตแสดงผล; อีเทอร์เน็ต; ไฟร์ไวร์; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); อินฟราเรด; สายไลท์นิง; M.2; MIDI; ไมโคร BNC; ไมโคร DIN; การ์ด Micro SD; ไมโคร USB; ไมโคร XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; สายโมเล็กซ์; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; การ์ด SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; ระบบจานดาวเทียม; TOSLINK; TRS; การเชื่อมต่อ; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; การชาร์จแบบไร้สาย; จอแสดงผลไร้สาย; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; อื่นๆ
nb: Enhetsgrensesnitt: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banankontakt; Tilkoblingsklemme; Bluetooth; Koaksial; Koaksial (F-type); Komponentvideo; Komposittvideo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Displayport; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarød; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD-kort; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-kort; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellitt; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Trådløs lading; Trådløs skjerm; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Annen
en: Device interface: 12G-SDI; 2.5 mm; 3.5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6.35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banana connector; Binding post; Bluetooth; Coaxial; Coaxial (F-Type); Component video; Composite video; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrared; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD card; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD card; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellite; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Wireless charging; Wireless display; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Other
vi: Giao diện thiết bị: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Đầu nối hình chuối; Cọc loa; Bluetooth; Đồng trục; Đồng trục (Loại F); Video thành phần; Video tổng hợp; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Hồng ngoại; Lightning; M.2; Ngang hoặc qua đầu gối; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Thẻ micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA); SCART; SCSI; Thẻ SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Vệ tinh; TOSLINK; TRS; Chia sẻ kết nối; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Sạc không dây; Màn hình không dây; XLR; XLR-5; Biến thể của chuẩn kết nối SATA; Khác
nl: Apparaatinterface: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banaanconnector; Bindende post; Bluetooth; Coaxiaal; Coaxiaal (F-type); Componentvideo; Composietvideo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Displaypoort; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarood; Bliksem; M.2; Midi; Micro-BNC; Micro-DIN; Micro SD-kaart; Micro-USB; Micro-XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-kaart; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelliet; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wifi; Draadloos opladen; Draadloos beeldscherm; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Andere
ru: Интерфейс устройства: 12G-SDI; 2,5 мм; 3,5 мм; 3G-SDI; 6,35 мм; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Разъем типа «банан»; Зажимной контакт; Bluetooth; Коаксиальный; Коаксиальный (тип F); Компонентный видеокабель; Композитный видеокабель; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Порт дисплея; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Инфракрасный; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Карта Micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-Video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Карта SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Спутниковое; TOSLINK; TRS; Тетеринг; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Беспроводная зарядка; Беспроводной дисплей; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Другое
cs: Rozhraní zařízení: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banánový konektor; Spojovací bod; Bluetooth; Koaxiální; Koaxiální (typ F); Komponentní video; Kompozitní video; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infračervená; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Karta Micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Karta SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelit; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Bezdrátové nabíjení; Bezdrátový displej; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Jiné
da: Enhedsgrænseflade: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Bananstik; Bindende stolpe; Bluetooth; Koaksial; Koaksial (F-type); Komponentvideo; Kompositvideo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Displayport; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarød; Lyn; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD-kort; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-kort; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellit; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Trådløs opladning; Trådløs skærm; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Andet
sk-SK: Rozhranie zariadenia: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banánový konektor; Záväzný príspevok; Bluetooth; Koaxiálny; Koaxiálny (typ F); Komponentné video; Kompozitné video; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Port displeja; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infračervený; Osvetlenie; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD karta; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD karta; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelit; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Bezdrôtové nabíjanie; Bezdrôtový displej; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Iné
pt-BR: Interface do dispositivo: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Conector banana; Terminal rosqueado; Bluetooth; Coaxial; Coaxial (Tipo F); Vídeo componente; Vídeo composto; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Porta de exibição; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infravermelho; Raio; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Cartão micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-vídeo; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Cartão SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satélite; TOSLINK; TRS; Ponto de acesso; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Carregamento sem fio; Exibição sem fio; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Outro
pl: Interfejs urządzenia: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Złącze bananowe; Śruba zaciskowa; Bluetooth; Współosiowy; Współosiowy (typ F); Złącze komponentowe wideo; Złącze komponentowe wideo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display port; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Podczerwień; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Karta MicroSD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Karta SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelita; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Ładowanie bezprzewodowe; Wyświetlacz bezprzewodowy; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Pozostałe
fi: Laitteen käyttöliittymä: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banaaniliitin; Sidontapylväs; Bluetooth; Koaksiaalinen; Koaksiaalinen (F-tyyppi); Komponenttivideo; Komposiittivideo; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Näyttöportti; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrapuna; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD -kortti; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-kortti; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satelliitti; TOSLINK; TRS; Jaettu yhteys; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Langaton lataus; Langaton näyttö; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Muu
bg-BG: Интерфейс на устройството: 12G-SDI; 2,5 мм; 3,5 мм; 3G-SDI; 6,35 мм; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Банан конектор; Присъединителна клема; Bluetooth; Коаксиален; Коаксиален (тип F); Компонентно видео; Композитно видео; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Порт за дисплей; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Инфрачервен; Осветение; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD карта; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD карта; SDI; SMA; SPI; Сателит; TOSLINK; TRS; Тетеринг; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Безжично зареждане; Безжичен дисплей; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Други
de: Geräteschnittstelle: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Bananenstecker; Polklemme; Bluetooth; Koaxial; Koaxial (F-Typ); Component Video; Composite Video; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Display-Port; Ethernet; FireWire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarot; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro-SD-Karte; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-Video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-Karte; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellit; TOSLINK; TRS; Tethering; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kabelloses Laden; Funkdisplay; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Sonstiges
fr: Interface de l’appareil: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Fiche banane; Poste de liaison; Bluetooth; Coaxiale; Coaxial (type F); Vidéo composante; Vidéo composite; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Port d’affichage; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infrarouge; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro BNC; Carte Micro SD; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-vidéo; SATA; SCART; SCSI; Carte SD; SDI; SMA; SPI; Satellite; TOSLINK; TRS; Partage de connexion; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Chargement sans fil; Affichage sans fil; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Autre
tr: Cihaz Arayüzü: 12G-SDI; 2.5 mm; 3.5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6.35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Muz fiş; Bağlama somunu; Bluetooth; Koaksiyel; Koaksiyel (F-Tipi); Bileşen video; Kompozit video; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; DisplayPort; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Kızılötesi; Lightning; M.2; Midi; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Mikro SD kart; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Moleks; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD kart; SDI; SMA; SPI; Uydu; TOSLINK; TRS; Bağlantı; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Kablosuz şarj; Kablosuz ekran; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Diğer
hu: Az eszköz interfésze: 12G-SDI; 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 3G-SDI; 6,35 mm; 6G-SDI; AUX; BNC; Banáncsatlakozó; Szorítókapocs; Bluetooth; Koaxiális; Koaxiális (F-típusú); Komponens videó; Összetett videó; DIN; DVI; DVI-I; Kijelzőport; Ethernet; Firewire; HD-SDI; HDMI; I2C; IDE (PATA); Infravörös; Lightning; M.2; MIDI; Micro BNC; Micro DIN; Micro SD-kártya; Micro USB; Micro XLR; Micro-VGA; Mini-DIN; Mini-VGA; Molex; NFC; NL2; NL4; PCIe; PS/2; RCA; RFID; S-video; SATA; SCART; SCSI; SD-kártya; SDI; SMA; SPI; Műholdas; TOSLINK; TRS; Internetmegosztás; Thunderbolt; UART; USB; VGA; Wi-Fi; Vezeték nélküli töltés; Vezeték nélküli kijelző; XLR; XLR-5; eSATA; Egyéb